Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 5. PROTECTION OF CONSUMER INTERESTS

SUBTITLE C. DECEPTIVE, UNFAIR, AND PROHIBITED PRACTICES

CHAPTER 563. PRACTICES RELATING TO CLAIMS REPORTING

Sec. 563.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Claims database" means a database used by insurers to share, among insurers, insureds' claims histories or damage reports concerning covered properties.

(2) "Insurer," "personal automobile insurance," and "residential property insurance" have the meanings assigned by Section 2254.001.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1147 (H.B. 1951), Sec. 13.001, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 563.002. REPORTING TO CLAIMS DATABASE. An insurer or an insurer's agent may not report to a claims database information regarding an inquiry by an insured regarding coverage provided under a personal automobile insurance policy or a residential property insurance policy unless and until the insured files a claim under the policy.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1147 (H.B. 1951), Sec. 13.001, eff. September 1, 2011.